Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.460

Violation of chapter—Penalties—Enforcement—Injunctions—Persons who may initiate proceedings.

(1) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any rule promulgated under it is guilty of a misdemeanor and may also be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars for each offense.

(2) It shall be the duty of all officers in the state or any political subdivision thereof to enforce this chapter. Any public officer may initiate an action before the board to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(3) The board may apply for relief by injunction without bond to restrain a person from committing any act that is prohibited by this chapter. In such proceedings, it is not necessary to allege or prove either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist or that substantial irreparable damage would result from the continued violation thereof. The members of the board shall not be personally liable for their actions in any such proceeding or in any other proceeding instituted by the board under this chapter. The board in any proper case shall cause prosecution to be instituted in any county or counties where any violation of this chapter occurs, and shall aid the prosecution of the violator.

(4) No person practicing architecture is entitled to maintain a proceeding in any court of this state relating to services in the practice of architecture unless it is alleged and proved that the person was registered or authorized under this chapter to practice or offer to practice architecture at the time the architecture services were offered or provided.

[ 2003 c 53 s 123; 1985 c 37 s 17.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.